Idaho, session 2025, S1150.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Agriculture the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund $12,000 $22,400 $34,400
II. ANIMAL INDUSTRIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $82,000 $82,000
Agricultural Fees - Livestock Disease Control
Fund $114,400 114,400
Agricultural Fees - Dairy Inspection
Fund 56,100 163,300 219,400
Federal Grant
Fund 0 31,900 31,900
TOTAL $138,100 $309,600 $447,700


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
III. AGRICULTURAL RESOURCES:
FROM:
Agricultural Fees - Pesticides
Fund $155,100 $155,100
IV. PLANT INDUSTRIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $63,400 $63,400
Agricultural Inspection
Fund $43,000 43,000
Invasive Species
Fund 171,200 171,200
Agricultural Fees - Commercial Feed and Fertilizer
Fund 39,900 107,000 146,900
Quality Assurance Laboratory Services
Fund 2,000 2,000
Federal Grant
Fund 0 31,100 31,100
TOTAL $103,300 $354,300 $457,600
V. AGRICULTURAL INSPECTIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $85,800 $85,800
Weights and Measures Inspection
Fund 8,100 $4,000 12,100
Agricultural Fees - Organic Food Products
Fund 5,100 $2,000 47,000 54,100
AgriculturalFees- FreshFruitandVegetableInspection
Fund 390,800 0 193,500 584,300
TOTAL $489,800 $2,000 $244,500 $736,300
VI. MARKET DEVELOPMENT:
FROM:
Agricultural Inspection
Fund $5,800 $5,800


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
GRAND TOTAL $731,200 $14,000 $1,091,700 $1,836,900
SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $1,724,300 from the General Fund to the Pest Control
Deficiency Fund as soon as practicable for the period July 1, 2024, through
June 30, 2025. Such moneys shall be used to reimburse costs incurred by the
Plant Industries Program in the Department of Agriculture pursuant to Sec-
tion 22-2019, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. In addition to any appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Soil and Water Conservation Commission the fol-
lowing amounts to be expended according to the following expense classes
from the General Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR:
Capital Outlay $40,500
Trustee and Benefit Payments 1,000,000
TOTAL $1,040,500
SECTION 4. WATER QUALITY PROGRAM FOR AGRICULTURE. Of the moneys appro-
priated in Section 3 of this act for trustee and benefit payments, $1,000,000
shall be used for the Water Quality Program for Agriculture in accordance
with Sections 22-2733 and 22-2734, Idaho Code, to provide cost-share financ-
ing for soil and water conservation projects, water delivery and drainage
rehabilitation and improvement projects, implementation of agricultural
best management practices, and other projects to enhance and restore the
soil and water resources of the state. The commission shall administer this
funding through existing grant procedures and personnel.
SECTION 5. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. There is hereby reappropriated
to the Soil and Water Conservation Commission any unexpended and unencum-
bered balances reappropriated to the Soil and Water Conservation Commission
for fiscal year 2025 from the General Fund to be used for nonrecurring expen-
ditures related to the Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program and the Wa-
ter Quality Program for Agriculture for the period July 1, 2025, through June
30, 2026. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropria-
tion amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Ser-
vices Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 6. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.


SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 2 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1, 3, 4, 5, and 6 of this act
shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.